dictionaries/kn.dic
ಅಕ್ಕಪಕ್ಕದವ/11,12
ಅಜ್ಜ/11
ಅಜ್ಜಿ/32
ಅಜ್ಞಾನಿ/31
ಅತ್ತೆ/92
ಅತ್ರಿ/31
ಅಥಣಿ/33
ಅಥರ್ವವೇದಿ/31
ಅದು/1001,1008
ಅದ್ವಿತೀಯ/13
ಅಧಿಕಾರಿಣಿ/32
ಅಧ್ಯಾಪಕಿ/32
ಅನಾಥ/11
ಅನಾಥೆ/92
ಅನಿಸಿಕೆ/93
ಅಪಘಾತ/13
ಅಪ್ಸರೆ/92
ಅಬ್ಬರಿಸು/6001
ಅಭಿಮಾನಿ/31
ಅಭಿಯಂತರ/11
ಅಭಿವೃದ್ಧಿ/33
ಅಭ್ಯರ್ಥಿ/31
ಅಮಾಯಕಿ/32
ಅಮೆರಿಕಾ/23
ಅಯೋಗ್ಯ/11
ಅರ್ಥ/13
ಅರ್ಪಿಸು/6001
ಅಲ್ಲಿ/1003
ಅವ/11,12
ಅವಸ್ಥೆ/93
ಅವಳಿ/31
ಅವಿನಾಶ/11
ಅವುಗಳ/1000,1001,1002
ಅಳು/6001,53
ಅಳುಕು/53
ಅಳೆ/6002
ಅಂಕೋಲಾ/23
ಅಂಗ/13
ಅಂಗಡಿಯಾಕೆ/92
ಅಂಗನೆ/92
ಅಂಗರಕ್ಷಕ/11
ಅಂಗರಕ್ಷಕಿ/32
ಅಂಗೈ/113
ಅಂಚೆ/93
ಅಂಜನಾ/22
ಅಂಜಲಿ/32
ಅಂಟಾರ್ಟಿಕಾ/23
ಅಂಟಿಸು/6001
ಅಂತರಿಕ್ಷಯಾನಿ/31
ಅಂತಹವ/11,12
ಅಂಧ/11,12
ಅಂಬರೀಶ/11
ಅಂಬಾಲಿಕಾ/22
ಅಂಬಿಕಾ/22
ಅಂಬೆ/92
ಆಕಾಂಕ್ಷಿ/31
ಆಕೃತಿ/33
ಆಕೆ/92
ಆಕ್ರಮಣ/11
ಆಕ್ಷೇಪ/13
ಆಗಮಿಸು/6001
ಆಗ್ರಾ/23
ಆಚರಿಸು/6001
ಆಚಾರಿ/31
ಆಚಾರ್ಯರು/14
ಆಟಗಾರ್ತಿ/32
ಆಟಿಕೆ/93
ಆನಂದಬಾಷ್ಪ/53
ಆಪ್ತೆ/92
ಆಯೋಜಕಿ/32
ಆರಿಸು/6001
ಆವರ್ತನ/13
ಆಶಿಸು/6001
ಆಸ್ಪತ್ರೆ/93
ಆಹುತಿ/33
ಇತರ/11,12
ಇದು/1001,1008
ಇಬ್ಬರು/14
ಇವ/11,12
ಇವರೀರ್ವರು/14
ಇಂತಹವ/11,12
ಇಂದು/53
ಈಜು/53,6001
ಈರ್ವರು/14
ಉಗ್ರಗಾಮಿ/31
ಉತ್ತರಿಸು/6001
ಉತ್ಪತ್ತಿ/33
ಉದಯ/11,13
ಉದ್ಘೋಷಕಿ/32
ಉದ್ಯೋಗಸ್ಥೆ/92
ಉಪಕುಲಪತಿ/31
ಉಪಭಾಷೆ/93
ಉಪಾಧ್ಯಾಯಿನಿ/32
ಉರ್ವಶಿ/32
ಉಸುಕು/53
ಉಳಿ/6002
ಉಂಟಾಗು/6001
ಋಷಿ/31
ಎಡಗೆನ್ನೆ/93
ಎಡಗೈ/113
ಎಲ್ಲರು/14
ಎಳನೀರು/53
ಏಕರೂಪ/13
ಏಕರೂಪತೆ/93
ಏಲಕ್ಕಿ/33
ಏಳು/6001
ಐಶ್ವರ್ಯಾ/22
ಒಟ್ಟು/53
ಒಪ್ಪಿಗೆ/93
ಓಡಿಸು/6001
ಓದುಗ/11
ಕಗ್ಗೊಲೆ/93
ಕಟ್ಟು/6001,53
ಕತ್ತಲು/53
ಕತ್ತಲೆ/93
ಕಥೆಗಾರ್ತಿ/32
ಕದಂಬರು/14
ಕನ್ನಡಿ/33
ಕನ್ಯೆ/92
ಕರತಾಡನ/13
ಕರೆಯೋಲೆ/93
ಕರ್ತೃ/71
ಕಲಾ/22
ಕಲಾವಿದೆ/92
ಕಲಿಸು/6001
ಕಸ/11
ಕಸರತ್ತು/53
ಕಳೆ/6002
ಕಾಪಾಡು/6001
ಕಾಯಿಪಲ್ಲೆ/93
ಕಾರಂಜಿ/33
ಕಾರ್ಯಕರ್ತೆ/92
ಕಾರ್ಯತಂತ್ರ/13
ಕಾರ್ಯದರ್ಶಿ/31
ಕಾಸರಗೋಡು/53
ಕಿರಣ/11,13
ಕೀಳು/6001
ಕುಣಿ/6002
ಕುಣಿದ/7001
ಕುಮಟಾ/23
ಕುರಿ/33
ಕುರುಡಿ/32
ಕುರುಡು/53
ಕುಲಪತಿ/31
ಕುಸಿ/6002
ಕುಸಿ/7001
ಕೂಸು/52
ಕೃತಘ್ನತೆ/93
ಕೃಷಿಕ/11
ಕೃಷ್ಣಾ/22
ಕೆರೆ/6002,13
ಕೆಲವರು/14
ಕೆಳಭಾಗ/13
ಕೆಂಪು/53
ಕೈ/113
ಕೈಗಾರಿಕಾ/23
ಕೊಟ್ಟಿಗೆ/93
ಕೊಳ್ಳಿ/33
ಕೊಂಬೆ/93
ಕಂಚು/53
ಕಂದಿಹೋಗು/6001
ಕಂಬಳ/13
ಕಂಬಳಿ/33
ಕ್ಷಣಗಣನೆ/93
ಕ್ಷೌರಿಕ/11
ಗಜಗಮನೆ/92
ಗಜಗಾಮಿನಿ/32
ಗಣಪತಿ/31
ಗಣಿ/33
ಗರ್ವ/13
ಗಸಗಸೆ/93
ಗಾಯಕಿ/32
ಗಿಂಡಿ/33
ಗುರು/51,53
ಗೃಹಸ್ಥೆ/92
ಗೊಜ್ಜು/53
ಗೋಚರಿಸು/6001
ಗೋಜಿ/33
ಗೋಡೆ/93
ಗೋಪಾಲ/11
ಗೋಪಿ/31
ಗೋವಾ/23
ಗಂಗಾ/22
ಗ್ರಾಮ/13
ಗ್ರಂಥಕರ್ತ/11
ಘೋಷಣೆ/93
ಚಕೋರಿ/32
ಚಡ್ಡಿ/33
ಚಹರೆ/93
ಚಹಾ/23
ಚಿಗುರೊಡೆ/7001
ಚಿದಂಬರ/11
ಚಿಪ್ಪು/53
ಚಿರಂಜೀವಿ/31
ಚಿಲಿಪಿಲಿ/33
ಚಿಲ್ಲರೆ/93
ಚೀಲ/13
ಚೇತರಿಸು/6001
ಜನತೆ/93
ಜನನಿ/32
ಜನರ/1000,1001,1002
ಜನರು/14
ಜನಾಂಗದವ/11,12
ಜವಾಬ್ದಾರಿ/33
ಜಾಗೃತ/11
ಜಾಣೆ/92
ಜಾತ್ರೆ/93
ಜಾಮೀನು/53
ಜಿಲ್ಲೆಯವ/11,12
ಜೀವನ/13
ಜ್ಯಾ/23
ಝರಿ/33
ಟೀಕೆ/93
ಠಾಣಾಧಿಕಾರಿ/31
ತಗಡು/53
ತಜ್ಞೆ/92
ತನುಜಾತೆ/92
ತಪ್ಪಿತಸ್ಥೆ/12
ತಪ್ಪಿತಸ್ಥೆ/92
ತಬ್ಬಲಿ/31
ತಮಟೆ/93
ತರಿಸು/6001
ತಾತ/11
ತಾಯಿ/32
ತಾಲೀಮು/53
ತಾಂತ್ರಿಕ/13
ತಿದ್ದುಪಡಿ/33
ತಿಲೋತ್ತಮೆ/92
ತುತ್ತು/53
ತುಂಗಭದ್ರಾ/22
ತುಂಗಾ/22
ತುಂಗೆ/92
ತುಂಟಿ/32
ತೂಗಿಸು/6001
ತೆಗೆ/6002
ತೆರೆ/93,6002
ತೆಂಗು/53
ತೊಡೆ/93
ತೊಳೆ/6002
ತೊಳೆಸು/6001
ತಂಗಾಳಿ/33
ದಡ್ಡಿ/32
ದತ್ತಾಂಶ/13
ದಲಿತೆ/92
ದಸರಾ/23
ದಿಕ್ಕು/53
ದಿನಚರಿ/33
ದೀಪಾ/22
ದುರಹಂಕಾರಿ/31
ದುರ್ಬಳಕೆ/93
ದೂರದರ್ಶನ/13
ದೂರವಾಗು/6001
ದೇವನಹಳ್ಳಿ/33
ದೇವರು/14
ದೊಡ್ಡಪ್ಪ/11
ಧರ್ಮೋಪದೇಶ/13
ಧಾರಾವಾಹಿ/33
ನಕ್ಷೆ/93
ನಗು/53,6001
ನಟಿ/32
ನಡೆ/6002
ನಡೆಸು/6001
ನರ್ಮದಾ/22
ನಲ್ಲೆ/92
ನಾಗರಾಜ/11
ನಾಮಪದ/13
ನಾಯಿ/33
ನಾರಿ/32
ನಿಘಂಟು/53
ನಿರತ/11,12
ನಿರಪರಾಧಿ/31
ನಿರೀಕ್ಷೆ/93
ನಿರೂಪಕ/11
ನಿರೂಪಿಸು/6001
ನಿರ್ದೇಶಕಿ/32
ನಿವೇದಿತಾ/22
ನಿಷಿದ್ಧ/13
ನೀಡಿದ/7001
ನೀಡು/6001
ನೀರಾ/23
ನೀಲಿ/33
ನೆನೆ/7001
ನೆರವು/53
ನೆರೆಹೊರೆಯವ/11,12
ನೇತಾರ/11
ನೇತ್ರಾವತಿ/32
ನೋಡಿದ/7001
ನ್ಯಾಯವಾದಿ/31
ಪಕ್ಕದಲ್ಲಿದ್ದವ/11,12
ಪಡೆ/93,6001
ಪತ್ರಕರ್ತೆ/92
ಪದರ/13
ಪದಸಂಪತ್ತು/53
ಪದಾಧಿಕಾರಿ/31
ಪದ್ಧತಿ/33
ಪರಿಣತ/11
ಪರಿಣತೆ/92
ಪಾಟಿ/33
ಪಾತಕಿ/31
ಪಾತ್ರ/13
ಪಾರ್ವತಿ/32
ಪಿತೃ/71
ಪುಢಾರಿ/31
ಪುಣ್ಯವಂತೆ/92
ಪುರಂದರ/11
ಪುಳಿಯೋಗರೆ/93
ಪೂಜಾ/22
ಪೆದ್ದಿ/32
ಪೈಕಿ/33
ಪೈರು/53
ಪೊರೆ/6002
ಪೋಷಿಸು/6001
ಪಂಚತಂತ್ರ/13
ಪ್ರತಿಫಲನ/11
ಪ್ರತಿಭಾ/22
ಪ್ರತಿವಾದಿ/31
ಪ್ರತಿವಂದನೆ/92
ಪ್ರಧಾನಮಂತ್ರಿ/31
ಪ್ರಯಾಣ/13
ಪ್ರವೇಶಿಸು/6001
ಪ್ರಶಸ್ತಿ/33
ಪ್ರಾಯೋಜಕಿ/32
ಪ್ರಾಂಶುಪಾಲ/11
ಪ್ರಿಯತಮೆ/92
ಪ್ರೇಕ್ಷಕ/11,12
ಪ್ರೇಮಕಥೆ/93
ಪ್ರೇಮಿ/31
ಬಡಗಣ/13
ಬಡವಿ/32
ಬಡಿ/6002
ಬದುಕು/53
ಬನ್ನಿ/33
ಬರೆ/6002
ಬಲಗೈ/113
ಬಸವೇಶ್ವರ/11
ಬಳಸಲ್ಪಡು/6001
ಬಳಿ/6002
ಬಾನು/53
ಬಾಪೂಜಿ/31
ಬಾರಿ/33
ಬಾಲಕಿ/32
ಬಿಡುಗಡೆಯಾಗು/6001
ಬಿದಿಗೆ/93
ಬಿಳಲು/53
ಬುದ್ಧಿ/33
ಬುರ್ಖಾ/23
ಬೆಳಗಿಕೊಳ್ಳು/6001
ಬೆಳಗು/53,6001
ಬೆಳೆ/6002
ಬೆಳೆ/93,6002
ಬೇಧಿ/33
ಬೇಸತ್ತ/7001
ಬೇಸಿಗೆಗಾಲ/13
ಬಂದ/7001
ಬಂದರು/53
ಬ್ರಹ್ಮಚಾರಿ/31
ಬ್ರಿಟಿಷ/11,12
ಭಗವದ್ಗೀತೆ/93
ಭಡ್ತಿ/32
ಭದ್ರಾ/22
ಭರಿಸು/6001
ಭಾಗ್ಯವಂತೆ/92
ಭಾರ್ಗವ/11
ಭುವಿ/33
ಭೂಗೋಳ/13
ಭೂಮಿ/32
ಭ್ರಷ್ಟೆ/92
ಮಕ್ಕಳ/1000,1001,1002
ಮಗಳು/52
ಮತ್ತೊಬ್ಬ/11,12
ಮತ್ತೊಂದು/53
ಮಥುರಾ/23
ಮಧುಸೂದನ/11
ಮಧ್ಯೆ/93
ಮಧ್ವಾಚಾರ್ಯರು/14
ಮನವಿ/33
ಮರಕತ/13
ಮರೆಗುಳಿ/31
ಮರೆವು/53
ಮಹಿಳಾ/22
ಮಹಿಳೆ/92
ಮಾಡಿದ/7001
ಮಾಡಿರು/6001
ಮಾತೆ/92
ಮಾದರಿ/33
ಮಾನವೀಯತೆ/93
ಮಾನ್ಯತಾ/22
ಮಾರ್ಮಿಕ/13
ಮಾವ/11
ಮಾಂಸಾಹಾರಿ/31
ಮಿಡಿ/33,6002
ಮಿನುಗು/53
ಮುಖ್ಯೋಪಾಧ್ಯಾಯಿನಿ/32
ಮುಗಿ/6002
ಮುಗ್ಧೆ/92
ಮುಟ್ಟಿಸು/6001
ಮುಡಿ/33
ಮುರಿ/6002
ಮುಸುಕು/53
ಮುಂಗೈ/113
ಮುಂದುವರೆ/6002
ಮುಂದುವರೆ/7001
ಮುಂಬೈ/113
ಮೂಕಾಂಬಿಕಾ/22
ಮೂಕಾಂಬಿಕೆ/92
ಮೃದು/53
ಮೇನಕಾ/22
ಮೇನಕೆ/92
ಮೇಯಿಸು/6001
ಮೇರೆ/93
ಮೇಲುಗೈ/113
ಮೇಲ್ಮೈ/113
ಮೇಸ್ತ್ರಿ/31
ಮೈ/113
ಮೈದಾನ/13
ಮೊಮ್ಮಗಳು/52
ಮೊಸರು/53
ಮಂಗಳ/11,13
ಮಂಡಕ್ಕಿ/33
ಯಜುರ್ವೇದಿ/31
ಯಮುನಾ/22
ಯಾರು/14
ಯಾವುದು/1001,1008
ಯುವತಿ/32
ಯೋಗಾಸನ/13
ರಕ್ತಸಂಬಂಧಿ/31
ರಚನೆ/93
ರಮಾ/22
ರಾಕ್ಷಸಿ/32
ರಾಘವೇಶ್ವರ/11
ರಾಜಕಾರಣಿ/31
ರಾಜಧಾನಿ/33
ರಾಜ್ಯದವ/11,12
ರಾಜ್ಯಸಭಾ/23
ರಾಜ್ಯಾಧ್ಯಕ್ಷೆ/92
ರಾಮಚಂದ್ರ/11
ರಾಮರಸ/13
ರುಚಿ/33
ರುಜುವಾತುಪಡಿಸು/6001
ರೇವು/53
ರೋಗಿ/31
ರಂಜನಾ/22
ರಂಭಾ/22
ರಂಭೆ/92
ಲಾಠಿ/33
ಲೋಕಸಭಾ/23
ಲೋಭ/13
ವಜಾ/23
ವಧೆ/93
ವಯಸ್ಸು/53
ವಲಸಿಗ/11
ವಾದಕಿ/32
ವಾರ್ತಾ/22
ವಾರ್ಧಕ/13
ವಿಖ್ಯಾತಿ/33
ವಿಜೇತೆ/92
ವಿದ್ಯಾರ್ಥಿ/31
ವಿದ್ವಾಂಸ/11
ವಿಧವೆ/92
ವಿಧಾನಸಭಾ/23
ವಿನಿಮಯ/13
ವಿನಿಯೋಗಿಸು/6001
ವಿಮರ್ಶಕಿ/32
ವಿವಿಧತೆ/93
ವಿಶ್ವನಾಥ/11
ವಿಷಮಶೀತಜ್ವರ/13
ವೃತ್ತಿಪರ/11,12
ವೃದ್ಧ/11
ವೃದ್ಧಿ/33
ವೃದ್ಧೆ/92
ವೇಗಿ/31
ವೇಶ್ಯೆ/92
ವ್ಯಸನ/13
ಶಕುನಿ/31
ಶರಾವತಿ/32
ಶಾಸಕ/11
ಶಾಸ್ತ್ರಿ/31
ಶಿಕ್ಷಕಿ/32
ಶಿಲಾಬಾಲಿಕೆ/93
ಶಿವಳ್ಳಿ/33
ಶಿಶು/53
ಶಿಷ್ಟಾಚಾರ/13
ಶುಭ್ರಗೊಳಿಸು/6001
ಶೇಕಡಾ/23
ಶೇಷ/11,13
ಶಂಕರಾಚಾರ್ಯರು/14
ಶ್ರೀಮಂತ/11
ಶ್ರೀಮಂತೆ/92
ಶ್ರುತಿ/32,33
ಸಚಿವೆ/92
ಸತ್ತವ/11,12
ಸದ್ಯ/13
ಸಮುದಾಯದವ/11,12
ಸಮ್ಮೇಳನ/13
ಸರಸ್ವತಿ/32
ಸರಾಸರಿ/33
ಸರಿ/6002
ಸಲುಗೆ/93
ಸವೆ/6002
ಸಹನಾ/22
ಸಹೋದ್ಯೋಗಿ/31
ಸಾಬೂನು/53
ಸಾಮಾಜಿಕ/13
ಸಾಮ್ರಾಜ್ಞಿ/32
ಸಾರಥಿ/31
ಸಾರ್ವಜನಿಕರು/14
ಸಿಕ್ಕಿಸು/6001
ಸಿನಿಮಾ/23
ಸಿಬ್ಬಂದಿ/31
ಸಿಂಧು/53
ಸೀತಾ/22
ಸೀಮಾ/22
ಸುದರ್ಶನ/13,11
ಸುಧಾ/22
ಸುಧಾರಣೆ/93
ಸುಲೋಚನಾ/32
ಸುಶ್ರಾವ್ಯ/13
ಸುಂಟರಗಾಳಿ/33
ಸೂಚಿಸು/6001
ಸೆಳೆ/6002
ಸೇಡು/53
ಸೇವಕಿ/32
ಸೊಸೆ/92
ಸಂಗಾತಿ/31
ಸಂಜೆ/93
ಸಂತ/11
ಸಂದಿಗ್ಧ/13
ಸಂಬಂಧಿ/31
ಸಂಭವಿಸು/6001
ಸಂಶೋಧಕಿ/32
ಸಂಸದೆ/92
ಸ್ನೇಹಿತೆ/92
ಸ್ಮರಣೀಯ/13
ಸ್ಮಾರ್ತ/11
ಸ್ವಾಮಿ/31
ಹಣ್ಣು/53
ಹರಿ/6001,33
ಹರಿ/6002
ಹಳದಿ/33
ಹಳೆ/93
ಹಿಡಿ/33,6002
ಹಿಡಿದಿಡು/6001
ಹಿನ್ನೀರು/53
ಹಿರಿಯ/11,12
ಹಿಂದುಳಿದವ/11,12
ಹುಚ್ಚ/11
ಹುಡುಗಿ/32
ಹೆಗ್ಗಣ/13
ಹೆಣೆ/93
ಹೆಣ್ಣು/52
ಹೆಂಡತಿ/32
ಹೈರಾಣಾಗು/6001
ಹೊಡೆ/6002
ಹೊಸತು/53
ಹೋದ/7001
ಹೋರಾಡು/6001
ಹಂಡೆ/93
ಹಂಸಗಾಮಿನಿ/32
